South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S386.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 23-31-600 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 23-31-600. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Identification card" is a photographic identification card complying with 18 U.S.C. Section 926C. (2) "Qualified retired law enforcement officer" shall have the same meaning as in 18 U.S.C. Section 926C. (B) An agency or department within this State may comply with 18 U.S.C. Section 926C, by issuing an identification card to any qualified retired law enforcement officer. If the agency or department currently issues credentials to active law enforcement officers, the agency or department may comply with the requirements of this section by issuing the same credentials to qualified retired law enforcement officers. If the same credentials are issued, then the agency or department must stamp the credentials with the word "RETIRED". (C)(1) Subject to the limitations of subsection (E), a A qualified retired law enforcement officer may carry a concealed weapon in this State if the qualified retired law enforcement officer possesses an identification card along with a certification that the qualified retired law enforcement officer has, not less recently than one year before the date the individual is carrying the firearm, met the standards established by the agency for training and qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry a firearm of the same type as the concealed firearm. (2) The firearms certification required by this subsection may be reflected on the identification card or may be in a separate document carried with the identification card. (D) The restrictions contained in Section 23-31-220 are applicable to a person carrying a concealed weapon pursuant to this section.  Carrying a concealed weapon into the residence or dwelling place of another person is prohibited without the expressed permission of the owner or person in legal control or possession of the premises, as appropriate. (E)(D) The agency or department must provide the qualified retired law enforcement officer with the opportunity to qualify to carry a firearm under the same standards for training and qualification for active law enforcement officers to carry firearms. However, the agency or department, as provided in 18 U.S.C. Section 926C, may require the qualified retired law enforcement officer to pay the actual expenses of the training and qualification. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----